California, session 20252026, AB1966.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12022.54 is added to the Penal Code, to read:12022.54. (a) A person convicted of committing a qualifying criminal activity against a person who is an undocumented individual shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for two years.(b) For the purposes of this section, “qualifying criminal activity” has the same meaning as qualifying criminal activity pursuant to Section 101(a)(15)(U)(iii) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act, which includes, but is not limited to, all of the following crimes:(1) Rape.(2) Torture.(3) Human trafficking.(4) Incest.(5) Domestic violence.(6) Sexual assault.(7) Abusive sexual conduct.(8) Prostitution.(9) Sexual exploitation.(10) Female genital mutilation.(11) Being held hostage.(12) Peonage.(13) Perjury.(14) Involuntary servitude.(15) Slavery.(16) Kidnapping.(17) Abduction.(18) Unlawful criminal restraint.(19) False imprisonment.(20) Blackmail.(21) Extortion.(22) Manslaughter.(23) Murder.(24) Felonious assault.(25) Witness tampering.(26) Obstruction of justice.(27) Fraud in foreign labor contracting.(28) Stalking.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.